North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 7. Fugitives from Justice.

§ 15-48.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-80, s. 10.

§ 15-49.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 166, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to Chapter 15A.

§§ 15-50 through 15-52.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to extradition, see

G.S. 15A-721

et seq. For North Carolina Extradition Manual and forms, see the Annotated Rules of North Carolina.

§ 15-53.
Governor may employ agents, and offer rewards.

The Governor, on information made to the Governor of any person, whether the name of such person be known or unknown, having committed a felony or other infamous crime within the State, and of having fled out of the jurisdiction thereof, or who conceals himself or herself within the State to avoid arrest, or who, having been convicted, has escaped and cannot otherwise be apprehended, may either employ a special agent, with a sufficient escort, to pursue and apprehend such fugitive, or issue a proclamation, and therein offer a reward, not exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), according to the nature of the case, as in the Governor’s opinion may be sufficient for the purpose, to be paid to anyone who shall apprehend and deliver the fugitive to such person and at such place as in the proclamation shall be directed.

History.

1800, c. 561, P.R; R.C., c. 35, s. 4; 1866, c. 28; 1868-9, c. 52; 1870-1, c. 15; 1871-2, c. 29; Code, s. 1169; 1891, c. 421; Rev., s. 3188; C.S., s. 4554; 1925, c. 275, s. 6; 1967, c. 165, s. 1; 2013-276, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-276, s. 1, effective July 18, 2013, in the first sentence, substituted “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)” for “ten thousand dollars ($10,000),” and made gender neutral changes.

§ 15-53.1.
Governor may offer rewards for information leading to arrest and conviction.

When it shall appear to the Governor, upon satisfactory information furnished to the Governor, that a felony or other infamous crime has been committed within the State, whether the name or names of the person or persons suspected of committing the said crime be known or unknown, the Governor may issue a proclamation and therein offer an award [reward] not exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), according to the nature of the case as, in the Governor’s opinion, may be sufficient for the purpose, to be paid to anyone who shall provide information leading to the arrest and conviction of such person or persons. The proclamation shall be upon such terms as the Governor may deem proper, but it shall identify the felony or felonies and the authority to whom the information is to be delivered and shall state such other terms as the Governor may require under which the reward is payable.

History.

1967, c. 165, s. 2; 2013-276, s. 2.

§ 15-54.
Officer entitled to reward.

Any sheriff or other officer who shall make an arrest of any person charged with crime for whose apprehension a reward has been offered is entitled to such reward, and may sue for and recover the same in any court in this State having jurisdiction: Provided, that no reward shall be paid to any sheriff or other officer for any arrest made for a crime committed within the county of such sheriff or officer making such arrest.

History.

1913, c. 132; 1917, c. 8; C.S., s. 4555.

Local Modification.

Wake: C.S., s. 4555.

Legal Periodicals.

For article as to whom an offer may be made, see 13 N.C.L. Rev. 15 (1935).